Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 2. Conservatorships for Absentees

§ 3-3-201.
Petition for appointment of conservator for absentee.

Any person may file with the clerk a petition for the appointment of a conservator of the property of the absent owner when the following conditions exist:

A person owns property located in this state and his location is unknown and no provision for care, control and supervision of the property has been made; and

The property is likely to be lost or damaged or the dependents of the owner are likely to be deprived of means of support because of the absence of the owner.

The petition shall state:

The name, age and last known address of the proposed ward and the names and addresses of the spouse and children of the proposed ward or of his parents if the proposed ward has no spouse or children or if he is a minor. If there are no spouse, children or parents, then the petition shall state the names and addresses of the proposed ward’s brothers and sisters. If there are no brothers or sisters, then the petition shall state the names and addresses of the nearest known relatives of the proposed ward;

The facts concerning the disappearance of the absentee;

The name and address of the proposed conservator, and his qualifications to serve in that capacity;

A general description of the property of the proposed ward within the state and of his right to receive property, the estimated present value of the real property, the estimated gross annual income of the estate and whether any money is payable, or to become payable, to the proposed ward from any source;

The facts showing the property of the absentee is likely to be lost or damaged, or his dependents are likely to be deprived of means of support because of his absence, and no proper provision has been made for the care, control and supervision of the property; and

The interests of the petitioner.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

§ 3-3-202.
Original notice governed by rules of civil procedure.

Notice of the filing of the petition and of the time and place set for the hearing on the petition shall be served upon the absentee by publication as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-203.
Additional notice governed by rules of civil procedure.

Notice of the filing of the petition and of the time and place set for the hearing on the petition shall also be served as provided by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure on:

The spouse and children of the absentee;

The testamentary beneficiaries, if known, and intestate heirs of the absentee; or

The parents or guardian of the absentee if he is a minor.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears on the printed act.

§ 3-3-204.
Pleadings and trial; rules of civil procedure.

All proceedings for the appointment of a conservator for an absent person shall be governed by the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure and the Wyoming Rules of Evidence.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-205.
Appointment of conservator.

If the allegations of the petition are proved by a preponderance of the evidence, the court may appoint a conservator.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

§ 3-3-206.
Appointment of temporary conservator.

Upon the filing of a petition for a temporary conservator and after a hearing the court may appoint a temporary conservator subject to any notice and conditions the court prescribes.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.